District of Columbia statutes.
1-1171.06

Rules.

The Board, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-335, § 7, 58 DCR 599
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-80, § 2(f), 61 DCR 169
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-80 substituted “Board” for “Board of Elections and Ethics”.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-4, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4624, 20 DCSTAT 1268).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-25, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3986, 20 DCSTAT 485).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-231, December 20, 2013, 61 DCR 3, 20 DCSTAT 2633).